Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-309
Assembled vehicle, defined.

Assembled vehicle means a motor vehicle or trailer which was manufactured or assembled less than thirty years prior to application for registration under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act and which is materially altered from its construction by the removal, addition, or substitution of new or used major component parts unless such major component parts were replaced under warranty by the original manufacturer of the motor vehicle or trailer. Its make shall be assembled, and its model year shall be the year in which the motor vehicle or trailer was assembled.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 9;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 42.